Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1707
Final action; when required; amended application.

Final action shall be taken by the city council, village board, or county board within one hundred eighty days after the filing of the request for site approval.

At any time prior to completion by the applicant of the presentation of the applicant's factual evidence and an opportunity for questioning by the city council, village board, or county board and members of the public, the applicant may file not more than one amended application upon payment of additional fees pursuant to section 13-1710. The time limitations prescribed in sections 13-1706 and 13-1708 for final action on an amended application shall be extended for an additional ninety days.

Laws 1991, LB 813, § 7.